Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-185
Thayer.

The county of Thayer is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range four, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township one, north, of range one, west; thence north along the sixth principal meridian to the first standard parallel; thence west to the northwest corner of township four, north, of range four, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 51, p. 222;

R.S.1913, § 900;

C.S.1922, § 802;

C.S.1929, § 25-189;

R.S.1943, § 22-185.